Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Subarticle A. Creation

§ 17-17-101.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Wyoming Statutory Close Corporation Supplement.”

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 201, § 1.

§ 17-17-102.
Application of Wyoming Business Corporation Act and the provisions of W.S. 17-3-101 through 17-3-104.

The Wyoming Business Corporation Act applies to statutory close corporations to the extent not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter.

This chapter applies to a professional corporation organized under W.S.

17-3-101

through

17-3-104

whose articles of incorporation contain the statement required by W.S. 17-17-103(a), except insofar as W.S.

17-3-101

through

17-3-104

contain inconsistent provisions.

This chapter does not repeal or modify any statute or rule of law that is or would apply to a corporation that is organized under the Wyoming Business Corporation Act and the provisions of W.S.

17-3-101

through

17-3-104

and that does not elect to become a statutory close corporation under W.S.

17-17-103

.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 201, § 1.

Cross references. —

For provisions of the Wyoming Business Corporation Act, see §

17-16-101

et seq.

§ 17-17-103.
Definition and election of statutory close corporation status.

A statutory close corporation is a corporation whose articles of incorporation contain a statement that the corporation is a statutory close corporation.

A corporation having thirty-five (35) or fewer shareholders may become a statutory close corporation by amending its articles of incorporation to include the statement required by subsection (a) of this section. For corporations formed prior to January 1, 1990, the amendment shall be approved by all of the holders of the votes of each class or series of shares of the corporation, whether or not otherwise entitled to vote on amendments. For corporations formed on or after January 1, 1990, the amendment must be approved by the holders of at least two-thirds (2/3) of the votes of each class or series of shares of the corporation, voting as separate voting groups, whether or not otherwise entitled to vote on amendments. If the amendment is adopted, a shareholder who voted against the amendment is entitled to assert dissenters’ rights under W.S.

17-16-1301

through

17-16-1331

.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 201, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

When is corporation close, or closely-held, corporation under common or statutory law, 111 ALR5th 207.